Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 20. Old Dominion University.

§ 23.1-2000.
Corporate name; name of the University.

The board of visitors of Old Dominion University (the board) is a corporation under the name and style of “Old Dominion University” and has, in addition to its other powers, all the corporate powers given to corporations by the provisions of Title 13.1 except those powers that are confined to corporations created pursuant to Title 13.1. The board shall at all times be under the control of the General Assembly.

The institution shall be known as Old Dominion University (the University).

All laws relating to Norfolk College or the board of visitors of Norfolk College shall be construed as relating to the University or the board, respectively.

History.

1962, c. 69, § 23-49.11; 1966, c. 18; 1974, c. 317; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2001.
Membership.

The board shall consist of 17 members appointed by the Governor, of whom at least 14 shall be residents of the Commonwealth and at least three shall be alumni of the University.

The alumni association of the University may submit to the Governor a list of at least three nominees for each vacancy on the board, whether the vacancy occurs by expiration of a term or otherwise. The Governor may appoint a member from the list of nominees.

History.

1962, c. 69, §§ 23-49.14, 23-49.15; 1966, c. 18; 1970, c. 624; 1974, c. 317; 1980, c. 100; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2002.
Meetings; officers; committees.

The board shall meet at the University once a year and at such other times as it determines. Special meetings of the board may be called by the rector or any three members. The secretary shall provide notice of any special meeting to each member.

A majority of members shall constitute a quorum.

In every even-numbered year, the board shall elect from its membership a rector to preside at its meetings, a vice-rector to preside at its meetings in the absence of the rector, and a secretary to preside at its meetings in the absence of the rector and vice-rector. Such officers shall assume their duties on July 1 of such year.

The board may appoint a pro tempore officer to preside at its meetings in the absence of the rector, vice-rector, and secretary.

Vacancies in the offices of rector, vice-rector, and secretary may be filled by the board for the unexpired term.

At every regular annual meeting of the board, an executive committee for the transaction of business in the recess of the board may be appointed, consisting of at least five members. The executive committee shall consist of the officers of the board and such other members as the rector may appoint.

History.

1962, c. 69, § 23-49.17; 1966, c. 18; 1974, c. 317; 1980, c. 100; 2002, c. 368; 2016, c. 588; 2018, c. 715.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 715, in subsection C, deleted “At the first meeting after July 1” at the beginning and added the second sentence.

§ 23.1-2003.
Powers and duties.

The board shall (i) appoint all teachers, staff members, and agents and fix their salaries and (ii) generally direct the affairs of the University.

The board may confer degrees.

The board may take, hold, and enjoy any gift, grant, devise, or bequest made to the University for any use or purpose designated by the donor or for the general purposes of the board when no use or purpose is designated, whether such gift, grant, devise, or bequest is made directly to the corporation or to trustees for its benefit.

History.

1962, c. 69, §§ 23-49.13, 23-49.17, 23-49.19; 1966, c. 18; 1974, c. 317; 1980, c. 100; 2002, c. 368; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2004.
Program of instruction to educate and train teachers.

The University may maintain a program of instruction to educate and train teachers for the public elementary and secondary schools of the Commonwealth.

History.

1962, c. 69, § 23-49.20; 1966, c. 18; 1974, c. 317; 2016, c. 588.